District of Columbia statutes.
26-831.04

Issuance of certificate of authority.

If the Commissioner approves the application of an applicant to be a merchant bank, the Commissioner shall issue to the applicant a charter stating that the applicant is authorized to conduct business as a merchant bank under this chapter.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 304, 48 DCR 3244